Utah statutes.
53B-11-102.   Use of Student Loan Fund.

(1)  The board may use the Student Loan Fund to assist students in attending an eligible institution defined in  Section 53B-13-102.

(2)  The board may contract with federal and state agencies and corporations, private nonprofit corporations, banks, or other lending institutions in the state to carry out this assistance program.

